Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 471.635, is amended to read: 471.635 ZONING ORDINANCES. deleted text begin Notwithstanding section 471.633,deleted text end A governmental subdivision may regulate by reasonable, nondiscriminatory, and nonarbitrary zoning ordinances, the location of businesses where firearms are sold by a firearms dealer. For the purposes of this section, a firearms dealer is a person who is federally licensed to sell firearms deleted text begin and a governmental subdivision is an entity described in sections 471.633 and 471.634deleted text end . Sec. 2. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 471.633; 471.634; 624.714, subdivision 23; 624.717; and 624.7191, subdivision 4, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-05790 471.633 FIREARMS. The legislature preempts all authority of a home rule charter or statutory city including a city of the first class, county, town, municipal corporation, or other governmental subdivision, or any of their instrumentalities, to regulate firearms, ammunition, or their respective components to the complete exclusion of any order, ordinance or regulation by them except that: (a) a governmental subdivision may regulate the discharge of firearms; and (b) a governmental subdivision may adopt regulations identical to state law. Local regulation inconsistent with this section is void. 471.634 DEFINITION. For purposes of section 471.633, the terms "municipal corporation" and "governmental subdivision," or instrumentality thereof, do not include school districts and other entities composed exclusively of school districts when school boards or school administrators are regulating school grounds, school facilities, school transportation services, school programs, or the conduct of students at any activities conducted under the direct or indirect supervision or control of the school board or administration. 624.714 CARRYING OF WEAPONS WITHOUT PERMIT; PENALTIES. Subd. 23. Exclusivity. This section sets forth the complete and exclusive criteria and procedures for the issuance of permits to carry and establishes their nature and scope. No sheriff, police chief, governmental unit, government official, government employee, or other person or body acting under color of law or governmental authority may change, modify, or supplement these criteria or procedures, or limit the exercise of a permit to carry. 624.717 LOCAL REGULATION. Sections 624.711 to 624.716 shall be construed to supersede municipal or county regulation of the carrying or possessing of pistols and the regulation of Saturday night special pistols. 624.7191 METAL-PENETRATING BULLETS. Subd. 4. Local regulation. This section shall be construed to supersede any municipal or county regulation of ammunition, including its component parts.